Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5075.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
ARTICLE 1 RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF
FY 2025

ARTICLE 1
RELATING TO MAKING REVISED APPROPRIATIONS IN SUPPORT OF FY 2025
SECTION 1. Subject to the conditions, limitations and restrictions hereinafter contained in this act,
the following general revenue amounts are hereby appropriated out of any money in the treasury
not otherwise appropriated to be expended during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025. The
amounts identified for federal funds and restricted receipts shall be made available pursuant to §
35-4-22 and chapter 41 of title 42. For the purposes and functions hereinafter mentioned, the state
controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw the state controller’s orders upon the general
treasurer for the payment of such sums or such portions thereof as may be required from time to
time upon receipt by the state controller of properly authenticated vouchers.
FY 2025 FY 2025 FY 2025
Enacted Change FINAL
Administration
Central Management
General Revenues 3,654,794 797,932 4,452,726
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 33,000,000 0 33,000,000
Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Public Health Response Warehouse Support 778,347 1,150,625 1,928,972
Health Care Facilities 10,000,000 0 10,000,000
Community Learning Center Programming
Support Grant 2,000,000 0 2,000,000
Municipal Public Safety Infrastructure 0 7,333,768 7,333,768
Total - Central Management 49,433,141 9,282,325 58,715,466
Legal Services
General Revenues 2,491,594 158,027 2,649,621
Accounts and Control
General Revenues 5,355,257 253,964 5,609,221
Restricted Receipts - OPEB Board Administration 155,811 (6,839) 148,972
Restricted Receipts - Grants Management
Administration 2,477,997 36,372 2,514,369
Total - Accounts and Control 7,989,065 283,497 8,272,562
Office of Management and Budget
General Revenues 9,915,379 197,284 10,112,663
LC000671 - Page 2 of 53

Federal Funds
Federal Funds 101,250 0 101,250
Federal Funds – Capital Projects Fund
CPF Administration 484,149 2,640,104 3,124,253
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Pandemic Recovery Office 1,345,998 493,772 1,839,770
Restricted Receipts 300,000 0 300,000
Other Funds 617,223 557,597 1,174,820
Total - Office of Management and Budget 12,763,999 3,888,757 16,652,756
Purchasing
General Revenues 4,232,292 56,930 4,289,222
Restricted Receipts 461,480 267,080 728,560
Other Funds 571,626 28,904 600,530
Total - Purchasing 5,265,398 352,914 5,618,312
Human Resources
General Revenues 943,668 4,084 947,752
Personnel Appeal Board
General Revenues 159,290 (71) 159,219
Information Technology
General Revenues 1,838,147 0 1,838,147
Restricted Receipts 3,379,840 8,246,510 11,626,350
Total - Information Technology 5,217,987 8,246,510 13,464,497
Library and Information Services
General Revenues 1,949,487 59,554 2,009,041
Federal Funds 1,606,151 (27,693) 1,578,458
Restricted Receipts 6,990 0 6,990
Total - Library and Information Services 3,562,628 31,861 3,594,489
Planning
General Revenues 1,175,750 4,201 1,179,951
Federal Funds 3,050 0 3,050
Restricted Receipts 50,000 50,000 100,000
Other Funds
Air Quality Modeling 24,000 0 24,000
Federal Highway - PL Systems Planning 3,597,529 127,414 3,724,943
LC000671 - Page 3 of 53

State Transportation Planning Match 454,850 27,487 482,337
FTA - Metro Planning Grant 1,453,240 39,827 1,493,067
Total - Planning 6,758,419 248,929 7,007,348
General
General Revenues
Miscellaneous Grants/Payments 510,405 (510,405) 0
Torts Court Awards 1,350,000 0 1,350,000
Wrongful Conviction Awards 811,446 0 811,446
Resource Sharing and State Library Aid 11,855,428 0 11,855,428
Library Construction Aid 2,232,819 0 2,232,819
Federal Funds- Capital Projects Fund
Community Learning Center Municipal
Grant Program 0 79,639,111 79,639,111
Restricted Receipts 700,000 398,187 1,098,187
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Security Measures State Buildings 975,000 99,137 1,074,137
Energy Efficiency Improvements 1,000,000 (1,000,000) 0
Cranston Street Armory 250,000 0 250,000
State House Renovations 2,209,000 4,815,744 7,024,744
Zambarano Buildings and Campus 4,740,000 9,181,243 13,921,243
Replacement of Fueling Tanks 700,000 507,587 1,207,587
Environmental Compliance 725,000 195,892 920,892
Big River Management Area 754,154 166,155 920,309
Shepard Building Upgrades 435,000 1,790,307 2,225,307
RI Convention Center Authority 3,590,000 0 3,590,000
Pastore Center Power Plant 250,000 344,982 594,982
Accessibility - Facility Renovations 288,928 656,986 945,914
DoIT Enterprise Operations Center 6,550,000 361,968 6,911,968
Cannon Building 700,000 0 700,000
Old State House 2,000,000 437,783 2,437,783
State Office Building 675,000 133,679 808,679
State Office Reorganization & Relocation 250,000 1,448,690 1,698,690
William Powers Building 2,400,000 3,252,693 5,652,693
LC000671 - Page 4 of 53

Pastore Center Non-Hospital Buildings Asset
Protection 10,405,000 8,253,116 18,658,116
Washington County Government Center 800,000 122,863 922,863
Chapin Health Laboratory 350,000 188,000 538,000
560 Jefferson Blvd Asset Protection 1,600,000 1,250,000 2,850,000
Arrigan Center 75,000 42,080 117,080
Civic Center 3,550,000 0 3,550,000
Pastore Center Buildings Demolition 9,900,000 497,925 10,397,925
Veterans Auditorium 400,000 0 400,000
Pastore Center Hospital Buildings Asset
Protection 2,400,000 (863,305) 1,536,695
Pastore Campus Infrastructure 22,195,000 18,758,431 40,953,431
Community Facilities Asset Protection 925,000 197,300 1,122,300
Zambarano LTAC Hospital 7,099,677 1,462,514 8,562,191
Medical Examiners - New Facility 50,000 2,229,462 2,279,462
Group Home Replacement & Rehabilitation 5,000,000 988,070 5,988,070
Hospital Reorganization 25,000,000 0 25,000,000
Expo Center 1,220,000 0 1,220,000
Group Homes Consolidation 4,325,000 0 4,325,000
Statewide Facility Master Plan 500,000 607,069 1,107,069
BHDDH DD & Community Facilities –
Asset Protection 0 294,872 294,872
BHDDH DD & Community Homes – Fire Code 0 143,473 143,473
BHDDH DD Regional Facilities –
Asset Protection 0 340,998 340,998
BHDDH Substance Abuse Asset Protection 0 18,341 18,341
BHDDH Group Homes 0 157,947 157,947
State Land Use Planning Study 0 250,000 250,000
Total - General 141,746,857 136,858,895 278,605,752
Debt Service Payments
General Revenues 164,837,664 (5,329,893) 159,507,771
Other Funds
Transportation Debt Service 32,887,674 1 32,887,675
Investment Receipts - Bond Funds 100,000 0 100,000
LC000671 - Page 5 of 53

Total - Debt Service Payments 197,825,338 (5,329,892) 192,495,446
Energy Resources
General Revenues 500,000 (500,000) 0
Provided that $250,000 is allocated to support the electric bicycle rebate program and $250,000 is
for the electric leaf blower rebate program.
Federal Funds 15,042,632 (15,042,632) 0
Restricted Receipts 25,217,475 (25,217,475) 0
Other Funds 4,064,322 (4,064,322) 0
Total - Energy Resources 44,824,429 (44,824,429) 0
Rhode Island Health Benefits Exchange
General Revenues 3,529,116 (1,497,514) 2,031,602
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 10,758,473 0 10,758,473
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Auto-Enrollment Program 0 166,065 166,065
Restricted Receipts 16,139,854 1,674,514 17,814,368
Total - Rhode Island Health Benefits
Exchange 30,427,443 343,065 30,770,508
Division of Equity, Diversity & Inclusion
General Revenues 2,152,119 23,395 2,175,514
Other Funds 110,521 (9,172) 101,349
Total - Division of Equity, Diversity
& Inclusion 2,262,640 14,223 2,276,863
Capital Asset Management and Maintenance
General Revenues 9,931,679 5,544 9,937,223
Statewide Personnel and Operations
FEMA Contingency Reserve
General Revenues 5,000,000 0 5,000,000
Pension Plan Revisions
General Revenues 20,600,000 (20,600,000) 0
Federal Funds 3,600,000 (3,600,000) 0
Restricted Receipts 1,100,000 (1,100,000) 0
Other Funds 2,200,000 (2,200,000) 0
Contract Reserve
LC000671 - Page 6 of 53

General Revenues 0 11,234,778 11,234,778
Federal Funds 0 567,862 567,862
Restricted Receipts 0 132,476 132,476
Other Funds 0 217,471 217,471
Total - Statewide Personnel and Operations 32,500,000 (15,347,413) 17,152,587
Grand Total - Administration 554,103,575 94,216,826 648,320,401
Office of Energy Resources
General Revenues 0 500,000 500,000
Provided that $250,000 is allocated to support the electric bicycle rebate program and $250,000 is
for the electric leaf blower rebate program.
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 0 21,404,650 21,404,650
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Electric Heat Pump Grant Program 0 14,033,712 14,033,712
Restricted Receipts 0 26,431,400 26,431,400
Other Funds
National Electric Vehicle Infrastructure Formula
Program 0 4,674,978 4,674,978
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Energy Efficiency Improvements 0 1,329,411 1,329,411
Grand Total - Energy Resources 0 68,374,151 68,374,151
Business Regulation
Central Management
General Revenues 3,999,763 136,544 4,136,307
Banking Regulation
General Revenues 1,904,080 114,285 2,018,365
Restricted Receipts 63,000 (14,500) 48,500
Total - Banking Regulation 1,967,080 99,785 2,066,865
Securities Regulation
General Revenues 880,722 69,016 949,738
Insurance Regulation
General Revenues 4,844,248 228,325 5,072,573
Restricted Receipts 1,872,951 (255,413) 1,617,538
Total - Insurance Regulation 6,717,199 (27,088) 6,690,111
LC000671 - Page 7 of 53

Office of the Health Insurance Commissioner
General Revenues 3,058,281 162,315 3,220,596
Federal Funds 403,180 10,000 413,180
Restricted Receipts 527,468 42,859 570,327
Total - Office of the Health Insurance
Commissioner 3,988,929 215,174 4,204,103
Board of Accountancy
General Revenues 5,490 0 5,490
Commercial Licensing and Gaming and Athletics Licensing
General Revenues 949,709 261,856 1,211,565
Restricted Receipts 1,046,895 (40,122) 1,006,773
Total - Commercial Licensing and Gaming
and Athletics Licensing 1,996,604 221,734 2,218,338
Building, Design and Fire Professionals
General Revenues 8,449,335 (341,477) 8,107,858
Federal Funds 345,863 503 346,366
Restricted Receipts 1,948,472 117,086 2,065,558
Other Funds
Quonset Development Corporation 67,300 (16,614) 50,686
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Fire Academy Expansion 7,056,000 30,720 7,086,720
Total - Building, Design and Fire Professionals 17,866,970 (209,782) 17,657,188
Office of Cannabis Regulation
Restricted Receipts 6,697,782 350,047 7,047,829
Grand Total - Business Regulation 44,120,539 855,430 44,975,969
Executive Office of Commerce
Central Management
General Revenues 2,264,703 50,640 2,315,343
Quasi-Public Appropriations
General Revenues
Rhode Island Commerce Corporation 8,506,041 0 8,506,041
Airport Impact Aid 1,010,036 0 1,010,036
Sixty percent (60%) of the first $1,000,000 appropriated for airport impact aid shall be distributed
to each airport serving more than 1,000,000 passengers based upon its percentage of the total
LC000671 - Page 8 of 53

passengers served by all airports serving more than 1,000,000 passengers. Forty percent (40%) of
the first $1,000,000 shall be distributed based on the share of landings during calendar year 2024
at North Central Airport, Newport-Middletown Airport, Block Island Airport, Quonset Airport,
T.F. Green International Airport and Westerly Airport, respectively. The Rhode Island commerce
corporation shall make an impact payment to the towns or cities in which the airport is located
based on this calculation. Each community upon which any part of the above airports is located
shall receive at least $25,000.
STAC Research Alliance 900,000 0 900,000
Innovative Matching Grants/Internships 1,000,000 0 1,000,000
I-195 Redevelopment District Commission 1,245,050 0 1,245,050
Polaris Manufacturing Grant 500,000 0 500,000
East Providence Waterfront Commission 50,000 0 50,000
Urban Ventures 140,000 0 140,000
Chafee Center at Bryant 476,200 0 476,200
Blackstone Valley Visitor Center 75,000 0 75,000
Municipal Infrastructure Grant Program 3,000,000 0 3,000,000
Infrastructure Bank – Statewide Coastal
Resiliency Plan 750,000 0 750,000
Industrial Recreational Building Authority
Obligations 452,553 0 452,553
Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Port of Davisville 0 45,635,990 45,635,990
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
I-195 Redevelopment District Commission 646,180 357,329 1,003,509
I-195 Park Improvements 3,000,000 0 3,000,000
Quonset Carrier Pier 2,250,000 0 2,250,000
Quonset Infrastructure 2,500,000 0 2,500,000
Total - Quasi-Public Appropriations 26,501,060 45,993,319 72,494,379
Economic Development Initiatives Fund
General Revenues
Innovation Initiative 1,000,000 0 1,000,000
Rebuild RI Tax Credit Fund 10,085,000 0 10,085,000
Small Business Promotion 750,000 0 750,000
LC000671 - Page 9 of 53

Destination Marketing 1,400,000 0 1,400,000
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 20,000,000 0 20,000,000
Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Assistance to Impacted Industries 2,000,000 1 2,000,001
Total - Economic Development Initiatives Fund 35,235,000 1 35,235,001
Commerce Programs
General Revenues
Wavemaker Fellowship 4,076,400 0 4,076,400
Provided that at least $500,000 shall be reserved for awards for medical doctor, nurse
practitioner, and physician assistant healthcare applicants who provide primary care services as
defined in § 42-64.26-3.
Air Service Development Fund 1,200,000 0 1,200,000
Main Street RI Streetscape Improvement Fund 1,000,000 0 1,000,000
Minority Business Accelerator 500,000 0 500,000
Federal Funds
Federal Funds – Capital Projects Fund
Broadband 0 25,786,500 25,786,500
Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Minority Business Accelerator 0 2,406,662 2,406,662
Bioscience Investments 0 42,999,400 42,999,400
Small Business Assistance 0 2,457,517 2,457,517
Total - Commerce Programs 6,776,400 73,650,079 80,426,479
Grand Total - Executive Office of Commerce 70,777,163 119,694,039 190,471,202
Housing
General Revenues 9,840,596 (672,883) 9,167,713
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 18,530,670 (124,406) 18,406,264
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Homelessness Assistance Program 17,300,000 5,795,840 23,095,840
Development of Affordable Housing 0 60,055,876 60,055,876
Home Repair and Community Revitalization 0 17,502,101 17,502,101
Homelessness Infrastructure 0 17,615,951 17,615,951
Housing Related Infrastructure 0 3,000,000 3,000,000
LC000671 - Page 10 of 53

Municipal Homelessness Support Initiative 0 1,887,465 1,887,465
Municipal Planning 0 2,300,000 2,300,000
Predevelopment and Capacity Building 0 256,825 256,825
Preservation of Affordable Housing Units 0 500,000 500,000
Proactive Housing Development 0 1,400,000 1,400,000
Site Acquisition 0 900 900
Statewide Housing Plan 0 1,961,351 1,961,351
Targeted Housing Development 0 26,000,000 26,000,000
Workforce Housing 0 16,327,497 16,327,497
Restricted Receipts 12,664,150 - 12,664,150
Grand Total - Housing 58,335,416 153,806,517 212,141,933
Labor and Training
Central Management
General Revenues 1,563,445 (7,028) 1,556,417
Restricted Receipts 305,765 170,565 476,330
Total - Central Management 1,869,210 163,537 2,032,747
Workforce Development Services
General Revenues 1,109,430 5,176 1,114,606
Provided that $200,000 of this amount is used to support Year Up.
Federal Funds 23,836,453 2,996,115 26,832,568
Other Funds 0 44,531 44,531
Total - Workforce Development Services 24,945,883 3,045,822 27,991,705
Workforce Regulation and Safety
General Revenues 4,833,768 186,338 5,020,106
Income Support
General Revenues 3,692,213 255,036 3,947,249
Federal Funds 18,875,141 7,316,530 26,191,671
Restricted Receipts 2,721,683 1,653,177 4,374,860
Other Funds
Temporary Disability Insurance Fund 278,906,931 (167,513) 278,739,418
Employment Security Fund 222,700,000 8,250,000 230,950,000
Total - Income Support 526,895,968 17,307,230 544,203,198
Injured Workers Services
Restricted Receipts 10,630,130 360,638 10,990,768
LC000671 - Page 11 of 53

Labor Relations Board
General Revenues 541,797 16,290 558,087
Governor’s Workforce Board
General Revenues 6,050,000 2,201,728 8,251,728
Provided that $600,000 of these funds shall be used for enhanced training for direct care and support
services staff to improve resident quality of care and address the changing health care needs of
nursing facility residents due to higher acuity and increased cognitive impairments pursuant to §
23-17.5-36.
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Enhanced Real Jobs 0 5,943,056 5,943,056
Restricted Receipts 18,304,506 4,230,860 22,535,366
Total - Governor’s Workforce Board 24,354,506 12,375,644 36,730,150
Grand Total - Labor and Training 594,071,262 33,455,499 627,526,761
Department of Revenue
Director of Revenue
General Revenues 2,883,605 47,165 2,930,770
Office of Revenue Analysis
General Revenues 1,015,848 85,700 1,101,548
Lottery Division
Other Funds
Other Funds 422,981,930 24,049,073 447,031,003
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Lottery Building Enhancements 690,000 (60,862) 629,138
Total - Lottery Division 423,671,930 23,988,211 447,660,141
Municipal Finance
General Revenues 2,241,697 (415,854) 1,825,843
Taxation
General Revenues 35,972,773 179,004 36,151,777
Restricted Receipts 4,826,512 (166,033) 4,660,479
Other Funds
Motor Fuel Tax Evasion 175,000 0 175,000
Total - Taxation 40,974,285 12,971 40,987,256
Registry of Motor Vehicles
General Revenues 31,206,744 4,034,290 35,241,034
LC000671 - Page 12 of 53

Federal Funds 805,667 (77,575) 728,092
Restricted Receipts 3,659,640 220,000 3,879,640
Total - Registry of Motor Vehicles 35,672,051 4,176,715 39,848,766
State Aid
General Revenues
Distressed Communities Relief Fund 12,384,458 0 12,384,458
Payment in Lieu of Tax Exempt Properties 49,201,412 0 49,201,412
Motor Vehicle Excise Tax Payments 234,712,307 6 234,712,313
Property Revaluation Program 1,887,448 0 1,887,448
Tangible Tax Exemption Program 28,000,000 (2,096,772) 25,903,228
Restricted Receipts 995,120 0 995,120
Total - State Aid 327,180,745 (2,096,766) 325,083,979
Collections
General Revenues 965,438 (16,677) 948,761
Grand Total - Revenue 834,605,599 25,781,465 860,387,064
Legislature
General Revenues 53,358,280 10,788,584 64,146,864
Restricted Receipts 2,431,651 158,758 2,590,409
Grand Total - Legislature 55,789,931 10,947,342 66,737,273
Lieutenant Governor
General Revenues 1,447,015 (76,912) 1,370,103
Secretary of State
Administration
General Revenues 5,076,740 384,272 5,461,012
Provided that $100,000 be allocated to support the Rhode Island Council for the Humanities for
grant making to civic and cultural organizations, and $50,000 to support Rhode Island’s
participation in the We the People Civics Challenge.
Corporations
General Revenues 2,807,730 36,451 2,844,181
State Archives
General Revenues 349,562 5,070 354,632
Restricted Receipts 384,347 9,315 393,662
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
LC000671 - Page 13 of 53

Rhode Island Archives and History Center 500,000 0 500,000
Total - State Archives 1,233,909 14,385 1,248,294
Elections and Civics
General Revenues 2,689,990 (19,106) 2,670,884
Federal Funds 2,001,207 0 2,001,207
Total - Elections and Civics 4,691,197 (19,106) 4,672,091
State Library
General Revenues 649,250 2,486 651,736
Provided that $125,000 be allocated to support the Rhode Island Historical Society and $18,000 be
allocated to support the Newport Historical Society, pursuant to §§ 29-2-1 and 29-2-2, and $25,000
be allocated to support the Rhode Island Black Heritage Society.
Office of Public Information
General Revenues 888,969 (64,230) 824,739
Receipted Receipts 25,000 0 25,000
Total - Office of Public Information 913,969 (64,230) 849,739
Grand Total - Secretary of State 15,372,795 354,258 15,727,053
General Treasurer
Treasury
General Revenues
General Revenues 3,022,950 156,313 3,179,263
Medical Debt Relief 1,000,000 0 1,000,000
Provided that unexpended or unencumbered balances as of June 30, 2025 are hereby reappropriated
to the following fiscal year.
Federal Funds 335,037 8,779 343,816
Other Funds
Temporary Disability Insurance Fund 247,266 (8,275) 238,991
Tuition Savings Program - Administration 353,760 16,155 369,915
Total -Treasury 4,959,013 172,972 5,131,985
State Retirement System
Restricted Receipts
Admin Expenses - State Retirement System 11,808,078 366,679 12,174,757
Retirement - Treasury Investment Operations 2,149,961 150,864 2,300,825
Defined Contribution - Administration 287,609 (26,029) 261,580
Total - State Retirement System 14,245,648 491,514 14,737,162
LC000671 - Page 14 of 53

Unclaimed Property
Restricted Receipts 2,981,837 123,688 3,105,525
Crime Victim Compensation
General Revenues 892,383 29,071 921,454
Federal Funds 427,993 15,000 442,993
Restricted Receipts 380,000 (130,000) 250,000
Total - Crime Victim Compensation 1,700,376 (85,929) 1,614,447
Grand Total - General Treasurer 23,886,874 702,245 24,589,119
Board of Elections
General Revenues 5,682,615 44,023 5,726,638
Rhode Island Ethics Commission
General Revenues 2,234,502 91,667 2,326,169
Office of Governor
General Revenues
General Revenues 8,321,265 502,554 8,823,819
Contingency Fund 150,000 0 150,000
Grand Total - Office of Governor 8,471,265 502,554 8,973,819
Commission for Human Rights
General Revenues 2,055,616 88,186 2,143,802
Federal Funds 450,110 97,750 547,860
Grand Total - Commission for Human Rights 2,505,726 185,936 2,691,662
Public Utilities Commission
Federal Funds 711,984 14,133 726,117
Restricted Receipts 13,895,536 421,324 14,316,860
Grand Total - Public Utilities Commission 14,607,520 435,457 15,042,977
Office of Health and Human Services
Central Management
General Revenues 58,336,613 (1,205,794) 57,130,819
Provided that $250,000 will be available for the Hospital Care Transitions Initiative if the
program receives approval for Medicaid match and $275,000 to assist nonprofit nursing facilities
transition licensed occupancy availability from nursing home beds to assisted living ones, of which
$200,000 shall be provided to Linn Health & Rehabilitation.
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 210,410,919 6,678,913 217,089,832
LC000671 - Page 15 of 53

Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinics 0 6,959,131 6,959,131
Pediatric Recovery 0 129 129
Restricted Receipts 47,669,671 (612,326) 47,057,345
Provided that $5.0 million is for Children’s Mobile Response and Stabilization Services
(MRSS) subject to CMS approval. Children’s MRSS program provides on-demand crisis
intervention services in any setting in which a behavioral health crisis is occurring including homes,
schools and hospital emergency departments. This state sanctioned mobile crisis service for
children and youth ages 2-21 shall be delivered through Care Coordination Agreements with an
organization that is certified as an Emergency Service Provider pursuant to Title 40.1, Chapter 5-
6(a)(2) of the General Laws of Rhode Island and 214-RICR-40-00-6 and has previously
participated in the state’s Children’s MRSS pilot program, and $250,000 shall be for the executive
office to develop an Olmstead Plan.
Total - Central Management 316,417,203 11,820,053 328,237,256
Medical Assistance
General Revenues
Managed Care 456,944,195 (6,661,537) 450,282,658
Hospitals 124,241,089 2,147,794 126,388,883
Nursing Facilities 173,311,380 11,970,720 185,282,100
Home and Community Based Services 97,185,377 3,377,473 100,562,850
Other Services 162,460,512 (21,699,418) 140,761,094
Pharmacy 96,904,515 (3,854,946) 93,049,569
Rhody Health 247,034,551 (9,559,513) 237,475,038
Federal Funds
Managed Care 613,138,381 (4,921,040) 608,217,341
Hospitals 242,897,784 9,752,204 252,649,988
Nursing Facilities 220,488,620 15,229,280 235,717,900
Home and Community Based Services 124,018,299 3,918,851 127,937,150
Other Services 789,376,252 (63,748,718) 725,627,534
Pharmacy (404,515) 1,154,946 750,431
Rhody Health 312,007,950 (2,586,615) 309,421,335
Other Programs 31,921,606 (581,387) 31,340,219
Restricted Receipts 9,808,674 3,601,728 13,410,402
Total - Medical Assistance 3,701,334,670 (62,460,178) 3,638,874,492
LC000671 - Page 16 of 53

Grand Total - Office of Health and
Human Services 4,017,751,873 (50,640,125) 3,967,111,748
Children, Youth and Families
Central Management
General Revenues 15,565,996 3,828,383 19,394,379
The director of the department of children, youth and families shall provide to the speaker of the
house and president of the senate at least every sixty (60) days beginning September 1, 2021, a
report on its progress implementing the accreditation plan filed in accordance with § 42-72-5.3 and
any projected changes needed to effectuate that plan. The report shall, at minimum, provide data
regarding recruitment and retention efforts including attaining and maintaining a diverse
workforce, documentation of newly filled and vacated positions, and progress towards reducing
worker caseloads.
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 8,718,289 6,964,234 15,682,523
Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Provider Workforce Stabilization 1,200,000 767,672 1,967,672
Total - Central Management 25,484,285 11,560,289 37,044,574
Children's Behavioral Health Services
General Revenues 7,732,064 (465,500) 7,266,564
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 9,693,607 (1,239,823) 8,453,784
Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Psychiatric Residential Treatment Facility 0 5,781,955 5,781,955
Total - Children's Behavioral Health Services 17,425,671 4,076,632 21,502,303
Youth Development Services
General Revenues 22,893,954 1,764,219 24,658,173
Federal Funds 224,837 19,755 244,592
Restricted Receipts 144,986 (143,486) 1,500
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Training School Asset Protection 250,000 127,152 377,152
Residential Treatment Facility 15,000,000 13,591,079 28,591,079
Total - Youth Development Services 38,513,777 15,358,719 53,872,496
Child Welfare
LC000671 - Page 17 of 53

General Revenues 214,966,186 (5,132,846) 209,833,340
Federal Funds 101,906,773 (13,686,826) 88,219,947
Restricted Receipts 558,571 917,877 1,476,448
Total - Child Welfare 317,431,530 (17,901,795) 299,529,735
Higher Education Incentive Grants
General Revenues 200,000 0 200,000
Provided that these funds and any unexpended or unencumbered previous years’ funding are to be
used exclusively to fund awards to eligible youth.
Grand Total - Children, Youth and Families 399,055,263 13,093,845 412,149,108
Health
Central Management
General Revenues
General Revenues 3,569,508 75,186 3,644,694
Primary Care Training Sites Program 2,700,000 2,332 2,702,332
Provided that unexpended or unencumbered balances as of June 30, 2025 are hereby reappropriated
to the following fiscal year.
Federal Funds 9,348,930 (1,975,351) 7,373,579
Restricted Receipts 18,260,961 1,227,754 19,488,715
Provided that the disbursement of any indirect cost recoveries on federal grants budgeted in this
line item that are derived from grants authorized under The Coronavirus Preparedness and
Response Supplemental Appropriations Act (P.L. 116-123); The Families First Coronavirus
Response Act (P.L. 116-127); The Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (P.L. 116-
136); The Paycheck Protection Program and Health Care Enhancement Act (P.L. 116-139); the
Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (P.L. 116-260); and the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021
(P.L. 117-2), are hereby subject to the review and prior approval of the director of management and
budget. No obligation or expenditure of these funds shall take place without such approval.
Total - Central Management 33,879,399 (670,079) 33,209,320
Community Health and Equity
General Revenues 1,151,326 11,217 1,162,543
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 83,451,102 7,743,317 91,194,419
Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Public Health Clinics 0 984,027 984,027
Restricted Receipts 80,924,334 (16,867,302) 64,057,032
LC000671 - Page 18 of 53

Total - Community Health and Equity 165,526,762 (8,128,741) 157,398,021
Environmental Health
General Revenues 7,155,472 138,305 7,293,777
Federal Funds 11,442,251 3,114,788 14,557,039
Restricted Receipts 968,283 43,075 1,011,358
Total - Environmental Health 19,566,006 3,296,168 22,862,174
Health Laboratories and Medical Examiner
General Revenues 13,340,120 218,938 13,559,058
Federal Funds 2,515,810 589,112 3,104,922
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Health Laboratories & Medical Examiner
Equipment 800,000 5,013 805,013
New Health Laboratory Building 2,221,762 633,430 2,855,192
Total - Health Laboratories and Medical Examiner 18,877,692 1,446,493 20,324,185
Customer Services
General Revenues 8,969,365 (49,469) 8,919,896
Federal Funds 7,882,616 151,072 8,033,688
Restricted Receipts 6,103,607 2,875,715 8,979,322
Total - Customer Services 22,955,588 2,977,318 25,932,906
Policy, Information and Communications
General Revenues 998,588 29,401 1,027,989
Federal Funds 4,095,600 (151,099) 3,944,501
Restricted Receipts 1,812,550 (40,489) 1,772,061
Total - Policy, Information and Communications 6,906,738 (162,187) 6,744,551
Preparedness, Response, Infectious Disease & Emergency Services
General Revenues 2,169,568 53,500 2,223,068
Federal Funds 17,503,333 1,047,588 18,550,921
Total - Preparedness, Response, Infectious
Disease & Emergency Services 19,672,901 1,101,088 20,773,989
COVID-19
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 68,869,887 19,473,904 88,343,791
Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
LC000671 - Page 19 of 53

COVID-19 Operational Support 0 12,233,311 12,233,311
Total – COVID-19 68,869,887 31,707,215 100,577,102
Grand Total - Health 356,254,973 31,567,275 387,822,248
Human Services
Central Management
General Revenues 6,793,641 (462,857) 6,330,784
Of this amount, $400,000 is to support the domestic violence prevention fund to provide direct
services through the Coalition Against Domestic Violence, $25,000 for the Center for Southeast
Asians, $450,000 to support Project Reach activities provided by the RI Alliance of Boys and Girls
Clubs, $300,000 is for outreach and supportive services through Day One, $800,000 is for food
collection and distribution through the Rhode Island Community Food Bank, $500,000 for services
provided to the homeless at Crossroads Rhode Island, $600,000 for the Community Action Fund,
$250,000 is for the Institute for the Study and Practice of Nonviolence’s Reduction Strategy,
$200,000 to provide operational support to the United Way’s 211 system, $125,000 is to support
services provided to the immigrant and refugee population through Higher Ground International,
and $50,000 is for services provided to refugees through the Refugee Dream Center and $100,000
for the Substance Use and Mental Health Leadership Council of RI.
The director of the department of human services shall provide to the speaker of the house,
president of the senate, and chairs of the house and senate finance committees at least every sixty
(60) days beginning August 1, 2022, a report on its progress in recruiting and retaining customer
serving staff. The report shall include: documentation of newly filled and vacated positions,
including lateral transfers, position titles, civil service information, including numbers of eligible
and available candidates, plans for future testing and numbers of eligible and available candidates
resulting from such testing, impacts on caseload backlogs and call center wait times, as well as
other pertinent information as determined by the director.
Federal Funds 8,012,780 33,689 8,046,469
Of this amount, $3.0 million is to sustain Early Head Start and Head Start programs.
Restricted Receipts 300,000 1,473,640 1,773,640
Total - Central Management 15,106,421 1,044,472 16,150,893
Child Support Enforcement
General Revenues 4,624,506 (1,318,723) 3,305,783
Federal Funds 9,988,214 455,814 10,444,028
Restricted Receipts 3,823,859 1,177,659 5,001,518
Total - Child Support Enforcement 18,436,579 314,750 18,751,329
LC000671 - Page 20 of 53

Individual and Family Support
General Revenues 44,747,836 3,400,377 48,148,213
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 130,770,837 17,902,092 148,672,929
Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Child Care Support 0 2,689,791 2,689,791
Restricted Receipts 705,708 (85,000) 620,708
Other Funds
Food Stamp Bonus Funding 298,874 (298,874) -
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Blind Vending Facilities 165,000 73,773 238,773
Total - Individual and Family Support 176,688,255 23,682,159 200,370,414
Office of Veterans Services
General Revenues 32,935,642 11,519 32,947,161
Of this amount, $200,000 is to provide support services through veterans’ organizations, $50,000
is to support Operation Stand Down, and $100,000 is to support the Veterans Services Officers
(VSO) program through the Veterans of Foreign Wars.
Federal Funds 16,618,112 (429,470) 16,188,642
Restricted Receipts 1,360,000 907,294 2,267,294
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Veterans Home Asset Protection 760,000 139,669 899,669
Veterans Memorial Cemetery Asset Protection 500,000 19,547 519,547
Total - Office of Veterans Services 52,173,754 648,559 52,822,313
Health Care Eligibility
General Revenues 10,634,812 (881,607) 9,753,205
Federal Funds 16,821,865 733,061 17,554,926
Total - Health Care Eligibility 27,456,677 (148,546) 27,308,131
Supplemental Security Income Program
General Revenues 16,588,320 58,487 16,646,807
Rhode Island Works
General Revenues 10,139,902 (19,105) 10,120,797
Federal Funds 97,508,826 (491,583) 97,017,243
Total - Rhode Island Works 107,648,728 (510,688) 107,138,040
LC000671 - Page 21 of 53

Other Programs
General Revenues
General Revenues 2,102,900 (203,730) 1,899,170
Retail SNAP Incentives Pilot Program 0 3,811,980 3,811,980
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 361,440,000 11,379,147 372,819,147
Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Retail SNAP Incentives Pilot Program 0 4,500,000 4,500,000
Restricted Receipts 8,000 0 8,000
Total - Other Programs 363,550,900 19,487,397 383,038,297
Office of Healthy Aging
General Revenues 14,223,241 141,203 14,364,444
Of this amount, $325,000 is to provide elder services, including respite, through the Diocese of
Providence; $40,000 is for ombudsman services provided by the Alliance for Long Term Care in
accordance with chapter 66.7 of title 42; $85,000 is for security for housing for the elderly in
accordance with § 42-66.1-3; and $1,400,000 is for Senior Services Support and $680,000 is for
elderly nutrition, of which $630,000 is for Meals on Wheels.
Federal Funds 18,548,799 844,499 19,393,298
Restricted Receipt 46,200 183,215 229,415
Other Funds
Intermodal Surface Transportation Fund 4,273,680 18,396 4,292,076
The Office shall reimburse the Rhode Island public transit authority for the elderly/disabled
transportation program expenses no later than fifteen (15) days of the authority’s submission of a
request for payment.
Total - Office of Healthy Aging 37,091,920 1,187,313 38,279,233
Grand Total - Human Services 814,741,554 45,763,903 860,505,457
Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Central Management
General Revenues 2,780,069 5,273,028 8,053,097
Federal Funds 1,276,605 1,303,705 2,580,310
Restricted Receipts 0 559,071 559,071
Total - Central Management 4,056,674 7,135,804 11,192,478
Hospital and Community System Support
General Revenues 1,463,642 (1,463,642) 0
LC000671 - Page 22 of 53

Federal Funds 400,294 (400,294) 0
Restricted Receipts 167,548 (167,548) 0
Total - Hospital and Community System Support 2,031,484 (2,031,484) 0
Services for the Developmentally Disabled
General Revenues 210,802,707 4,982,019 215,784,726
Provided that of this general revenue funding, an amount certified by the department shall be
expended on certain community-based department of behavioral healthcare, developmental
disabilities and hospitals (BHDDH) developmental disability private provider and self-directed
consumer direct care service worker raises and associated payroll costs as authorized by BHDDH
and to finance the new services rates implemented by BHDDH pursuant to the Consent Decree
Addendum. Any increase for direct support staff and residential or other community-based setting
must first receive the approval of BHDDH.
Provided further that this general revenue funding, $982,957 shall be expended on a Transformation
Fund to be used for I/DD integrated day activities and supported employment services, or which a
total of $583,021 shall be expended specifically on those who self-direct for creation of regional
service advisement models and pool of substitute staff. All unexpended or unencumbered balances
of this designation at the end of the fiscal year shall be reappropriated to the ensuing fiscal year and
made immediately available for the same purpose.
Federal Funds 262,600,057 7,252,007 269,852,064
Provided that of this federal funding, an amount certified by the department shall be expended on
certain community-based department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and
hospitals (BHDDH) developmental disability private provider and self-directed consumer direct
care service worker raises and associated payroll costs as authorized by BHDDH and to finance the
new services rates implemented by BHDDH pursuant to the Consent Decree Addendum. Any
increase for direct support staff and residential or other community-based setting must first receive
the approval of BHDDH.
Provided further that this federal funding, $508,803 shall be expended on a Transformation Fund
to be used for I/DD integrated day activities and supported employment services. All unexpended
or unencumbered balances of this designation at the end of the fiscal year shall be reappropriated
to the ensuing fiscal year and made immediately available for the same purpose.
Restricted Receipts 1,444,204 (143,338) 1,300,866
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
DD Residential Support 100,000 98,462 198,462
LC000671 - Page 23 of 53

Total - Services for the Developmentally Disabled 474,946,968 12,189,150 487,136,118
Behavioral Healthcare Services
General Revenues 4,118,531 653,546 4,772,077
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 33,919,356 (313,825) 33,605,531
Provided that $250,000 from Social Services Block Grant funds is awarded to The Providence
Center to coordinate with Oasis Wellness and Recovery Center for its support and services program
offered to individuals with behavioral health issues.
Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
9-8-8 Hotline 1,875,000 1,637,658 3,512,658
Crisis Intervention Trainings 0 1,649,886 1,649,886
Restricted Receipts 6,759,883 7,776,177 14,536,060
Provided that $500,000 from the opioid stewardship fund is distributed equally to the seven regional
substance abuse prevention task forces to fund priorities determined by each Task Force.
Total - Behavioral Healthcare Services 46,672,770 11,403,442 58,076,212
Hospital and Community Rehabilitative Services
General Revenues 53,030,624 1,269,060 54,299,684
Federal Funds 53,088,129 2,199,437 55,287,566
Restricted Receipts 4,535,481 1,014,700 5,550,181
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Hospital Equipment 500,000 111,974 611,974
Total - Hospital and Community Rehabilitative
Services 111,154,234 4,595,171 115,749,405
State of RI Psychiatric Hospital
General Revenues 33,499,422 1,229,687 34,729,109
Grand Total - Behavioral Healthcare,
Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals 672,361,552 34,521,770 706,883,322
Office of the Child Advocate
General Revenues 1,891,426 22,314 1,913,740
Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing
General Revenues 782,651 (19,971) 762,680
Restricted Receipts 131,533 10,296 141,829
Grand Total - Comm. On Deaf and
LC000671 - Page 24 of 53

Hard-of-Hearing 914,184 (9,675) 904,509
Governor’s Commission on Disabilities
General Revenues
General Revenues 765,088 160,733 925,821
Livable Home Modification Grant Program 765,304 640,539 1,405,843
Provided that this will be used for home modification and accessibility enhancements to construct,
retrofit, and/or renovate residences to allow individuals to remain in community settings. This will
be in consultation with the executive office of health and human services. All unexpended or
unencumbered balances, at the end of the fiscal year, shall be reappropriated to the ensuing fiscal
year, and made immediately available for the same purpose.
Federal Funds 340,000 67 340,067
Restricted Receipts 66,539 651 67,190
Grand Total - Governor’s Commission on Disabilities 1,936,931 801,990 2,738,921
Office of the Mental Health Advocate
General Revenues 981,608 (105,935) 875,673
Elementary and Secondary Education
Administration of the Comprehensive Education Strategy
General Revenues 39,044,536 118,171 39,162,707
Provided that $90,000 be allocated to support the hospital school at Hasbro Children’s Hospital
pursuant to § 16-7-20 and that $395,000 be allocated to support child opportunity zones through
agreements with the department of elementary and secondary education to strengthen education,
health and social services for students and their families as a strategy to accelerate student
achievement and further provided that $450,000 and 3.0 full-time equivalent positions be allocated
to support a special education function to facilitate individualized education program (IEP) and 504
services; and further provided that $130,000 be allocated to City Year for the Whole School Whole
Child Program, which provides individualized support to at-risk students.
Provided that all unexpended or unencumbered balances as of June 30, 2025, relating to the
Learn365RI program are hereby reappropriated to the following fiscal year.
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 268,294,480 25,866,121 294,160,601
Provided that $684,000 from the department’s administrative share of Individuals with Disabilities
Education Act funds be allocated to the Paul V. Sherlock Center on Disabilities to support the
Rhode Island Vision Education and Services Program.
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
LC000671 - Page 25 of 53

Adult Education Providers 127,822 3,423,444 3,551,266
Out of School Time Education Providers 0 4,000,000 4,000,000
Restricted Receipts
Restricted Receipts 1,654,727 549,123 2,203,850
HRIC Adult Education Grants 3,500,000 0 3,500,000
Total - Admin. of the Comprehensive Ed. Strategy 312,621,565 33,956,859 346,578,424
Davies Career and Technical School
General Revenues 18,131,389 108,374 18,239,763
Federal Funds 1,782,145 219,967 2,002,112
Restricted Receipts 4,667,353 92,789 4,760,142
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Davies School HVAC 1,050,000 188,361 1,238,361
Davies School Asset Protection 750,000 (53,825) 696,175
Davies School Healthcare Classroom
Renovations 6,886,250 0 6,886,250
Davies School Wing Renovation 32,000,000 (29,551,398) 2,448,602
Total - Davies Career and Technical School 65,267,137 (28,995,732) 36,271,405
RI School for the Deaf
General Revenues 8,675,430 (69,222) 8,606,208
Federal Funds 304,316 50,886 355,202
Restricted Receipts 570,169 526,831 1,097,000
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
School for the Deaf Asset Protection 167,648 228,324 395,972
Total - RI School for the Deaf 9,717,563 736,819 10,454,382
Metropolitan Career and Technical School
General Revenues 11,131,142 0 11,131,142
Federal Funds 500,000 0 500,000
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
MET School Asset Protection 2,000,000 1,622,014 3,622,014
Total - Metropolitan Career and Technical School 13,631,142 1,622,014 15,253,156
Education Aid
LC000671 - Page 26 of 53

General Revenues 1,219,745,842 (101,315) 1,219,644,527
Provided that the criteria for the allocation of early childhood funds shall prioritize pre-kindergarten
seats and classrooms for four-year-olds whose family income is at or below one hundred eighty-
five percent (185%) of federal poverty guidelines and who reside in communities with higher
concentrations of low performing schools and that at least $2.0 million of the allocation of career
and technical funds shall be coordinated with the career and technical education board of trustees
to be directed to new programs to provide workforce training for jobs which there are no active
programs.
Federal Funds 46,450,000 3,699,320 50,149,320
Restricted Receipts 42,626,878 (4,794,346) 37,832,532
Total - Education Aid 1,308,822,720 (1,196,341) 1,307,626,379
Central Falls School District
General Revenues 53,634,574 407,315 54,041,889
Federal Funds 1,000,000 0 1,000,000
Total - Central Falls School District 54,634,574 407,315 55,041,889
School Construction Aid
General Revenues
School Housing Aid 106,198,555 (416,527) 105,782,028
School Building Authority Capital Fund 0 416,527 416,527
Total- School Construction Aid 106,198,555 0 106,198,555
Teachers' Retirement
General Revenues 132,268,922 6,029,548 138,298,470
Grand Total - Elementary and Secondary
Education 2,003,162,178 12,560,482 2,015,722,660
Public Higher Education
Office of Postsecondary Commissioner
General Revenues 30,122,180 659,173 30,781,353
Provided that $455,000 shall be allocated to Onward We Learn pursuant to § 16-70-5, $75,000
shall be allocated to Best Buddies Rhode Island to support its programs for children with
developmental and intellectual disabilities. It is also provided that $7,378,650 $7,384,665 shall be
allocated to the Rhode Island promise scholarship program; $151,410 shall be used to support
Rhode Island’s membership in the New England Board of Higher Education; $3,375,500
$3,574,101 shall be allocated to the Rhode Island hope scholarship program, and $200,000 shall be
allocated to the Rhode Island School for Progressive Education to support access to higher
LC000671 - Page 27 of 53

education opportunities for teachers of color.
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 4,900,773 24,104 4,924,877
Guaranty Agency Administration 60,000 0 60,000
Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Foster Care Youth Scholarship 1,021,859 0 1,021,859
Fresh Start Scholarship 0 3,002,747 3,002,747
RI Reconnect 0 7,196,921 7,196,921
RIC Cybersecurity Center 0 1,595,322 1,595,322
Restricted Receipts 7,854,557 110,071 7,964,628
Other Funds
Tuition Savings Program - Scholarships
and Grants 3,500,000 0 3,500,000
Nursing Education Center - Operating 3,120,498 50,200 3,170,698
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
WEC Expansion - Annex Site 1,220,000 (1,220,000) 0
Total - Office of Postsecondary
Commissioner 51,799,867 11,418,538 63,218,405
University of Rhode Island
General Revenues
General Revenues 110,775,396 170,825 110,946,221
Provided that in order to leverage federal funding and support economic development, $700,000
shall be allocated to the small business development center, $125,000 shall be allocated to the
Institute for Labor Studies & Research and that $50,000 shall be allocated to Special Olympics
Rhode Island to support its mission of providing athletic opportunities for individuals with
intellectual and developmental disabilities.
Debt Service 31,664,061 0 31,664,061
RI State Forensics Laboratory 1,784,983 6,320 1,791,303
Other Funds
University and College Funds 794,703,980 31,311,160 826,015,140
Debt - Dining Services 744,765 (1) 744,764
Debt - Education and General 6,850,702 (1,124,822) 5,725,880
Debt - Health Services 118,345 (116,482) 1,863
Debt - Housing Loan Funds 14,587,677 20,000 14,607,677
LC000671 - Page 28 of 53

Debt - Memorial Union 91,202 1,001 92,203
Debt - Ryan Center 2,377,246 0 2,377,246
Debt - Parking Authority 531,963 0 531,963
URI Restricted Debt Service - Energy
Conservation 524,431 0 524,431
URI Debt Service - Energy Conservation 1,914,069 0 1,914,069
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Asset Protection 14,006,225 102,772 14,108,997
Mechanical, Electric, and Plumbing
Improvements 7,858,588 2,454,468 10,313,056
Fire Protection Academic Buildings 3,311,666 201,843 3,513,509
Bay Campus 6,000,000 4,298,591 10,298,591
Athletics Complex 8,882,689 855,142 9,737,831
Provided that total Rhode Island capital plan funds provide no more than 80.0 percent of the total
project.
Stormwater Management 2,221,831 (1,777,240) 444,591
Fine Arts Center Renovation 8,000,000 82,531 8,082,531
PFAS Removal Water Treatment Plant 1,015,192 3,736,815 4,752,007
Total - University of Rhode Island 1,017,965,011 40,222,923 1,058,187,934
Notwithstanding the provisions of § 35-3-15, all unexpended or unencumbered balances as of June
30, 2025 relating to the university of Rhode Island are hereby reappropriated to fiscal year 2026.
Rhode Island College
General Revenues
General Revenues 67,902,836 272,475 68,175,311
Debt Service 8,178,392 0 8,178,392
Rhode Island Vision Education and Services
Program 1,800,000 0 1,800,000
Other Funds
University and College Funds 107,027,705 6,529,958 113,557,663
Debt - Education and General 714,519 742,700 1,457,219
Debt - Student Union 207,150 0 207,150
Debt - G.O. Debt Service 1,602,610 0 1,602,610
Debt - Energy Conservation 742,700 0 742,700
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
LC000671 - Page 29 of 53

Asset Protection 5,785,000 6,709,486 12,494,486
Infrastructure Modernization 5,675,000 5,882,864 11,557,864
Master Plan Phase III 5,000,000 539,604 5,539,604
Phase IV: Whipple Hall 500,000 0 500,000
Total - Rhode Island College 205,135,912 20,677,087 225,812,999
Notwithstanding the provisions of § 35-3-15, all unexpended or unencumbered balances as of June
30, 2025, relating to Rhode Island college are hereby reappropriated to fiscal year 2026.
Community College of Rhode Island
General Revenues
General Revenues 61,231,829 247,881 61,479,710
Debt Service 1,054,709 0 1,054,709
Restricted Receipts 814,584 111,983 926,567
Other Funds
University and College Funds 104,016,119 9,286,836 113,302,955
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Asset Protection 2,719,452 1,350,305 4,069,757
Data, Cabling, and Power Infrastructure 4,200,000 335,108 4,535,108
Flanagan Campus Renovations 5,700,000 0 5,700,000
CCRI Renovation and Modernization Phase I 16,000,000 1,118 16,001,118
CCRI Accessibility Improvements 200,000 0 200,000
Total - Community College of RI 195,936,693 11,333,231 207,269,924
Notwithstanding the provisions of § 35-3-15, all unexpended or unencumbered balances as of June
30, 2025, relating to the community college of Rhode Island are hereby reappropriated to fiscal
year 2026.
Grand Total - Public Higher Education 1,470,837,483 83,651,779 1,554,489,262
RI State Council on the Arts
General Revenues
Operating Support 1,205,211 17,281 1,222,492
Grants 1,190,000 0 1,190,000
Provided that $400,000 be provided to support the operational costs of WaterFire Providence art
installations.
Federal Funds 996,126 15,654 1,011,780
Other Funds
Art for Public Facilities 585,000 75,000 660,000
LC000671 - Page 30 of 53

Grand Total - RI State Council on the Arts 3,976,337 107,935 4,084,272
RI Atomic Energy Commission
General Revenues 1,180,419 51,220 1,231,639
Restricted Receipts 25,036 0 25,036
Other Funds
URI Sponsored Research 338,456 9,556 348,012
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Asset Protection 50,000 0 50,000
Grand Total - RI Atomic Energy Commission 1,593,911 60,776 1,654,687
RI Historical Preservation and Heritage Commission
General Revenues 1,898,100 (150,889) 1,747,211
Provided that $30,000 support the operational costs of the Fort Adams Trust’s restoration activities
and that $25,000 shall be allocated to Rhode Island Slave History Medallions.
Federal Funds 1,267,431 346,458 1,613,889
Restricted Receipts 419,300 0 419,300
Other Funds
RIDOT Project Review 142,829 (7,389) 135,440
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Archaeological Collection Facility 0 50,000 50,000
Grand Total - RI Historical Preservation and
Heritage Comm. 3,727,660 238,180 3,965,840
Attorney General
Criminal
General Revenues 21,173,986 1,214,582 22,388,568
Federal Funds 3,231,773 570,854 3,802,627
Restricted Receipts 1,473,682 1,320,124 2,793,806
Total - Criminal 25,879,441 3,105,560 28,985,001
Civil
General Revenues 7,005,430 (37,266) 6,968,164
Federal Funds 0 100,000 100,000
Restricted Receipts 3,616,629 420,135 4,036,764
Total - Civil 10,622,059 482,869 11,104,928
Bureau of Criminal Identification
General Revenues 2,164,423 175,106 2,339,529
LC000671 - Page 31 of 53

Federal Funds 33,332 31,215 64,547
Restricted Receipts 2,847,793 (409,195) 2,438,598
Total - Bureau of Criminal Identification 5,045,548 (202,874) 4,842,674
General
General Revenues 4,759,579 221,439 4,981,018
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Building Renovations and Repairs 150,000 115,000 265,000
Total - General 4,909,579 336,439 5,246,018
Grand Total - Attorney General 46,456,627 3,721,994 50,178,621
Corrections
Central Management
General Revenues 22,522,753 1,984,912 24,507,665
Federal Funds 0 139,354 139,354
Total – Central Management 22,522,753 2,124,266 24,647,019
The department of corrections shall conduct a study to evaluate recidivism trends and outcomes of
existing correctional programs intended to promote rehabilitation and reduce recidivism. The report
shall include, but not be limited to, historical recidivism rates including demographic data, and
regional comparisons; prison population projections and driving factors; an inventory of evidence-
based rehabilitative practices and programs; and a review of correctional industries and its
alignment to workforce needs. On or before March 1, 2025, the department of corrections must
submit a report to the governor, the speaker of the house and the president of the senate including
a summary, relevant data and findings, and recommendations to reduce recidivism.
Parole Board
General Revenues 1,526,785 78,988 1,605,773
Custody and Security
General Revenues 163,902,830 308,264 164,211,094
Federal Funds 1,333,277 1,238,569 2,571,846
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Intake Service Center HVAC 23,946,648 6,880,852 30,827,500
Total - Custody and Security 189,182,755 8,427,685 197,610,440
Institutional Support
General Revenues 34,243,329 (358,224) 33,885,105
LC000671 - Page 32 of 53

Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Asset Protection 4,100,000 5,577,650 9,677,650
Correctional Facilities – Renovations 3,179,677 250,000 3,429,677
Total - Institutional Support 41,523,006 5,469,426 46,992,432
Institutional Based Rehab/Population Management
General Revenues 14,780,027 (463,372) 14,316,655
Provided that $1,050,000 be allocated to Crossroads Rhode Island for sex offender discharge
planning.
The director of the department of corrections shall provide to the speaker of the house and president
of the senate at least every ninety (90) days beginning September 1, 2022, a report on efforts to
modernize the correctional industries program. The report shall, at minimum, provide data on the
past ninety (90) days regarding program participation; changes made in programming to more
closely align with industry needs; new or terminated partnerships with employers, nonprofits, and
advocacy groups; current program expenses and revenues; and the employment status of all persons
on the day of discharge from department care who participated in the correctional industries
program.
Federal Funds 455,919 492,232 948,151
Restricted Receipts 44,800 1,933,496 1,978,296
Total - Institutional Based Rehab/Population Mgt. 15,280,746 1,962,356 17,243,102
Healthcare Services
General Revenues 34,782,837 464,761 35,247,598
Restricted Receipts 1,331,555 (1,331,555) 0
Total - Healthcare Services 36,114,392 (866,794) 35,247,598
Community Corrections
General Revenues 21,987,526 (24,981) 21,962,545
Federal Funds 30,639 8,949 39,588
Restricted Receipts 10,488 (7,397) 3,091
Total - Community Corrections 22,028,653 (23,429) 22,005,224
Grand Total - Corrections 328,179,090 17,172,498 345,351,588
Judiciary
Supreme Court
General Revenues
General Revenues 35,952,258 2,156,535 38,108,793
LC000671 - Page 33 of 53

Provided however, that no more than $1,375,370 in combined total shall be offset to the public
defender’s office, the attorney general’s office, the department of corrections, the department of
children, youth and families, and the department of public safety for square-footage occupancy
costs in public courthouses and further provided that $500,000 be allocated to the Rhode Island
Coalition Against Domestic Violence for the domestic abuse court advocacy project pursuant to §
12-29-7 and that $90,000 be allocated to Rhode Island Legal Services, Inc. to provide housing and
eviction defense to indigent individuals.
Defense of Indigents 6,075,432 1,800,000 7,875,432
Federal Funds 123,424 71,260 194,684
Restricted Receipts 4,182,232 44,126 4,226,358
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Judicial Complexes - HVAC 500,000 0 500,000
Judicial Complexes Asset Protection 2,250,000 251,388 2,501,388
Judicial Complexes Fan Coil Unit Replacements 500,000 0 500,000
Garrahy Courthouse Restoration 1,125,000 136,029 1,261,029
Garrahy Courtroom Restoration 0 10,615 10,615
Total - Supreme Court 50,708,346 4,469,953 55,178,299
Judicial Tenure and Discipline
General Revenues 174,997 7,230 182,227
Superior Court
General Revenues 27,995,998 1,526,150 29,522,148
Restricted Receipts 665,000 (340,000) 325,000
Total - Superior Court 28,660,998 1,186,150 29,847,148
Family Court
General Revenues 26,940,842 1,569,855 28,510,697
Federal Funds 3,678,496 1,558,511 5,237,007
Total - Family Court 30,619,338 3,128,366 33,747,704
District Court
General Revenues 16,384,243 948,092 17,332,335
Federal Funds 616,036 23,733 639,769
Restricted Receipts 60,000 0 60,000
Total - District Court 17,060,279 971,825 18,032,104
Traffic Tribunal
LC000671 - Page 34 of 53

General Revenues 10,812,491 618,112 11,430,603
Workers' Compensation Court
Restricted Receipts 9,931,788 494,206 10,425,994
Grand Total - Judiciary 147,968,237 10,875,842 158,844,079
Military Staff
General Revenues 3,276,320 (80,602) 3,195,718
Federal Funds 86,857,534 (936,362) 85,921,172
Restricted Receipts
RI Military Family Relief Fund 55,000 0 55,000
RING Counter-Drug Program 0 11,000 11,000
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Aviation Readiness Center 3,294,818 87,195 3,382,013
Asset Protection 1,799,185 713,816 2,513,001
Quonset Airport Runway Reconstruction 1,339,988 629,379 1,969,367
Quonset Air National Guard HQ Facility 3,000,000 0 3,000,000
Counter-Drug Training Facility 2,000,000 0 2,000,000
Sun Valley Armory 0 382,512 382,512
Grand Total - Military Staff 101,622,845 806,938 102,429,783
Public Safety
Central Management
General Revenues 13,318,898 (93,568) 13,225,330
Provided that $400,000 shall be allocated to support the Family Service of Rhode Island’s GO
Team program of on-scene support to children who are victims of violence and other traumas. It
is also provided that $11,500,000 $11,524,954 shall be allocated as the state contribution for the
statewide body-worn camera program, subject to all program and reporting rules, regulations,
policies, and guidelines prescribed in the Rhode Island General Laws. Notwithstanding the
provision of § 35-3-15 of the general laws, all unexpended or unencumbered balances as of June
30, 2025 from this appropriation are hereby reappropriated to fiscal year 2026.
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 15,542,257 961,562 16,503,819
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Support for Survivors of Domestic Violence 10,000,000 (651,071) 9,348,929
Restricted Receipts 309,252 99,125 408,377
LC000671 - Page 35 of 53

Total - Central Management 39,170,407 316,048 39,486,455
E-911 Emergency Telephone System
Restricted Receipts 11,103,966 267,535 11,371,501
Security Services
General Revenues 30,711,397 196,809 30,908,206
Municipal Police Training Academy
General Revenues 299,114 2,584 301,698
Federal Funds 417,455 86,969 504,424
Total - Municipal Police Training Academy 716,569 89,553 806,122
State Police
General Revenues 91,080,925 2,577,991 93,658,916
Federal Funds 6,784,981 3,305,726 10,090,707
Restricted Receipts 1,096,000 370,000 1,466,000
Other Funds
Airport Corporation Assistance 150,630 (297) 150,333
Road Construction Reimbursement 3,354,650 22,950 3,377,600
Weight and Measurement Reimbursement 248,632 215,769 464,401
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
DPS Asset Protection 3,425,000 291,082 3,716,082
Southern Barracks 21,500,000 536,972 22,036,972
Training Academy Upgrades 1,550,000 (725,000) 825,000
Statewide Communications System Network 245,048 0 245,048
Total - State Police 129,435,866 6,595,193 136,031,059
Grand Total - Public Safety 211,138,205 7,465,138 218,603,343
Office of Public Defender
General Revenues 16,585,559 591,377 17,176,936
Federal Funds 85,035 0 85,035
Grand Total - Office of Public Defender 16,670,594 591,377 17,261,971
Emergency Management Agency
General Revenues 7,007,474 55,122 7,062,596
Federal Funds 28,880,583 6,435,123 35,315,706
Restricted Receipts 412,371 7,527 419,898
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
LC000671 - Page 36 of 53

RI Statewide Communications Infrastructure 140,000 524,198 664,198
State Emergency Ops Center 80,000 0 80,000
RI Statewide Communications 700 MHZ Project 0 1,388,188 1,388,188
RI Statewide Communications Warehouse 0 250,000 250,000
Emergency Management Building 0 250,000 250.000
Grand Total - Emergency Management
Agency 36,520,428 8,910,158 45,430,586
Environmental Management
Office of the Director
General Revenues 9,024,403 373,181 9,397,584
Of this general revenue amount, $180,000 is appropriated to the conservation districts and $100,000
is appropriated to the Wildlife Rehabilitators Association of Rhode Island for a veterinarian at the
Wildlife Clinic of Rhode Island.
Federal Funds 40,100 314,875 354,975
Restricted Receipts 4,894,237 1,700,867 6,595,104
Total - Office of the Director 13,958,740 2,388,923 16,347,663
Natural Resources
General Revenues 32,344,157 (523,805) 31,820,352
Provided that of this general revenue amount, $150,000 is to be used for marine mammal response
activities in conjunction with matching federal funds.
Federal Funds 23,602,130 10,446,377 34,048,507
Restricted Receipts 6,078,419 141,524 6,219,943
Other Funds
DOT Recreational Projects 762,000 0 762,000
Blackstone Bike Path Design 1,000,000 0 1,000,000
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Dam Repair 5,386,000 113,970 5,499,970
Fort Adams Rehabilitation 300,000 91,194 391,194
Port of Galilee 13,300,000 1,051,189 14,351,189
Newport Pier Upgrades 500,000 121,578 621,578
Recreation Facilities Asset Protection 750,000 171,908 921,908
Recreational Facilities Improvements 5,729,077 1,213,495 6,942,572
Natural Resources Office and Visitor's Center 250,000 211,165 461,165
Fish & Wildlife Maintenance Facilities 200,000 102,443 302,443
LC000671 - Page 37 of 53

Marine Infrastructure/Pier Development 950,000 0 950,000
Total - Natural Resources 91,151,783 13,141,038 104,292,821
Environmental Protection
General Revenues 15,870,312 (1,073,838) 14,796,474
Federal Funds 12,377,846 289,910 12,667,756
Restricted Receipts 10,332,134 4,113,851 14,445,985
Other Funds
Transportation MOU 41,769 48,595 90,364
Total - Environmental Protection 38,622,061 3,378,518 42,000,579
Grand Total - Environmental Management 143,732,584 18,908,479 162,641,063
Coastal Resources Management Council
General Revenues 3,607,384 350,043 3,957,427
Federal Funds 2,319,579 4,599,430 6,919,009
Restricted Receipts 250,000 0 250,000
Other Funds
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Pawcatuck Resiliency Elevation Study 0 50,000 50,000
Little Narragansett Bay Study 0 50,000 50,000
Grand Total - Coastal Resources Mgmt. Council 6,176,963 5,049,473 11,226,436
Transportation
Central Management
Federal Funds 15,122,388 (1,356,995) 13,765,393
Other Funds
Gasoline Tax 8,265,215 1,001,931 9,267,146
Total - Central Management 23,387,603 (355,064) 23,032,539
Management and Budget
Other Funds
Gasoline Tax 4,243,682 (267,118) 3,976,564
Infrastructure Engineering
Federal Funds
Federal Funds 402,650,393 36,362,568 439,012,961
Federal Funds – State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Municipal Roads Grant Program 7,000,000 16,183,415 23,183,415
RIPTA Operating Grant 15,000,000 0 15,000,000
LC000671 - Page 38 of 53

The Rhode Island public transit authority shall conduct a thorough review of its transit operations
and administration. The aim of this review is to uncover ways to enhance efficiency and streamline
costs, ensuring a more effective use of resources. This evaluation shall encompass a range of areas,
including but not limited to, a comprehensive analysis of the fixed-route service. Analysis should
include operating expenses, ridership figures, cost per rider, and other pertinent data across all
routes and serviced regions. A review focusing on the cost-effectiveness of the agency’s diverse
transit services will be a key component of this study. Additionally, the study shall explore different
transit service delivery models, incorporating successful strategies from other transit systems;
financial planning strategies; agency management structure, capital plan development, and funding
strategies; project management; and transit master plan scope and schedule. By March 1, 2025, the
Rhode Island public transit authority shall compile and present a report to the governor, the speaker
of the house, and the president of the senate. This report will summarize the findings of the study
and include recommendations aimed at fostering sustainable and effective transit operations.
Washington Bridge Project 35,000,000 0 35,000,000
Turnpike and Bridge Authority –
Safety Barriers Study 0 641,764 641,764
Restricted Receipts 6,116,969 48,848 6,165,817
Other Funds
Gasoline Tax 71,061,818 75,544 71,137,362
Land Sale Revenue 6,568,333 (346,898) 6,221,435
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Highway Improvement Program 141,102,060 8,200,000 149,302,060
Bike Path Asset Protection 400,000 0 400,000
RIPTA - Land and Buildings 11,214,401 (2,373,403) 8,840,998
RIPTA - Pawtucket/Central Falls Bus Hub
Passenger Facility 3,424,529 75,471 3,500,000
RIPTA Providence High-Capacity Transit
Corridor Study 0 250,000 250,000
RIPTA – Kingston Station Mobility Hub 0 1,140,000 1,140,000
Total - Infrastructure Engineering 699,538,503 60,257,309 759,795,812
Infrastructure Maintenance
Other Funds
Gasoline Tax 39,244,619 (432,456) 38,812,163
The department of transportation will establish a municipal roadway database, which will include
LC000671 - Page 39 of 53

information concerning the name, condition, length, roadway infrastructure, and pedestrian features
of each municipal roadway, updated annually by municipalities. The database will serve as a
comprehensive and transparent list of municipal roadway conditions.
Rhode Island Highway Maintenance Account 119,070,245 152,932,332 272,002,577
Rhode Island Capital Plan Funds
Maintenance Capital Equipment Replacement 1,800,000 2,009,769 3,809,769
Maintenance Facilities Improvements 500,000 127,859 627,859
Welcome Center 150,000 300,028 450,028
Salt Storage Facilities 1,150,000 223,000 1,373,000
Train Station Asset Protection 475,585 654,377 1,129,962
Total - Infrastructure Maintenance 162,390,449 155,814,909 318,205,358
Grand Total - Transportation 889,560,237 215,450,036 1,105,010,273
Statewide Totals
General Revenues 5,594,861,257 15,809,263 5,610,670,520
Federal Funds 5,066,548,689 593,827,028 5,660,375,717
Restricted Receipts 463,143,051 27,846,019 490,989,070
Other Funds 2,838,671,543 332,474,634 3,171,146,177
Statewide Grand Total 13,963,224,540 969,956,944 14,933,181,484
SECTION 2. Each line appearing in section 1 of this article shall constitute an appropriation.
SECTION 3. The general assembly authorizes the state controller to establish the internal service
accounts shown below, and no other, to finance and account for the operations of state agencies
that provide services to other agencies, institutions and other governmental units on a cost
reimbursed basis. The purpose of these accounts is to ensure that certain activities are managed in
a businesslike manner; promote efficient use of services by making agencies pay the full costs
associated with providing the services; and allocate the costs of central administrative services
across all fund types, so that federal and other non-general fund programs share in the costs of
general government support. The controller is authorized to reimburse these accounts for the cost
of work or services performed for any other department or agency subject to the following
expenditure limitations:
Account Expenditure Limit
FY 2025 FY 2025 FY 2025
Enacted Change FINAL
State Assessed Fringe Benefit Internal Service Fund 36,946,270 261,300 37,207,570
Administration Central Utilities Internal Service Fund 30,029,111 (70,288) 29,958,823
LC000671 - Page 40 of 53

State Central Mail Internal Service Fund 8,419,019 68,509 8,487,528
State Telecommunications Internal Service Fund 3,748,530 42,501 3,791,031
State Automotive Fleet Internal Service Fund 15,496,081 5,458,171 20,954,252
Surplus Property Internal Service Fund 44,789 0 44,789
Health Insurance Internal Service Fund 272,804,635 (91,576) 272,713,059
Other Post-Employment Benefits Fund 63,854,008 0 63,854,008
Capitol Police Internal Service Fund 1,466,975 122,219 1,589,194
Corrections Central Distribution Center
Internal Service Fund 7,659,339 960,340 8,619,679
Correctional Industries Internal Service Fund 8,247,332 201,181 8,448,513
Secretary of State Record Center Internal Service Fund 1,166,547 38,749 1,205,296
Human Resources Internal Service Fund 17,669,248 405,918 18,075,166
DCAMM Facilities Internal Service Fund 53,327,083 619,088 53,946,171
Information Technology Internal Service Fund 62,092,295 1,431,481 63,523,776
SECTION 4. Departments and agencies listed below may not exceed the number of full- time
equivalent (FTE) positions shown below in any pay period. Full-time equivalent positions do not
include limited period positions or, seasonal or intermittent positions whose scheduled period of
employment does not exceed twenty-six consecutive weeks or whose scheduled hours do not
exceed nine hundred and twenty-five (925) hours, excluding overtime, in a one-year period. Nor
do they include individuals engaged in training, the completion of which is a prerequisite of
employment. Provided, however, that the governor or designee, speaker of the house of
representatives or designee, and the president of the senate or designee may authorize an adjustment
to any limitation. Prior to the authorization, the state budget officer shall make a detailed written
recommendation to the governor, the speaker of the house, and the president of the senate. A copy
of the recommendation and authorization to adjust shall be transmitted to the chairman of the house
finance committee, senate finance committee, the house fiscal advisor, and the senate fiscal advisor.
State employees whose funding is from non-state general revenue funds that are time limited shall
receive limited term appointment with the term limited to the availability of non-state general
revenue funding source.
FY 2025 FTE POSITION AUTHORIZATION
Departments and Agencies Full-Time Equivalent
Administration 683.6 667.6
Provided that no more than 419.1 of the total authorization would be limited to positions that
support internal service fund programs.
LC000671 - Page 41 of 53

Office of Energy Resources 16.0
Business Regulation 181.0
Executive Office of Commerce 5.0
Housing 38.0
Labor and Training 461.7
Revenue 599.5
Legislature 298.5
Office of the Lieutenant Governor 8.0
Office of the Secretary of State 62.0
Office of the General Treasurer 91.0
Board of Elections 13.0
Rhode Island Ethics Commission 12.0
Office of the Governor 45.0
Commission for Human Rights 15.0
Public Utilities Commission 57.0
Office of Health and Human Services 233.0
Children, Youth and Families 714.5
Health 572.6
Human Services 779.0
Office of Veterans Services 267.0
Office of Healthy Aging 33.0
Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals 1,221.4
Provided that 18.0 of the total authorization would be limited to independent facilitators positions
to comply with the Consent Decree Addendum.
Office of the Child Advocate 13.0
Commission on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing 4.0
Governor’s Commission on Disabilities 5.0
Office of the Mental Health Advocate 6.0
Elementary and Secondary Education 156.1
Provided that 3.0 of the total authorization would be available only for positions that are supported
by the healthy environments advance learning grant at the school building authority.
School for the Deaf 61.0
Davies Career and Technical School 123.0
Office of Postsecondary Commissioner 46.0
LC000671 - Page 42 of 53

Provided that 1.0 of the total authorization would be available only for positions that are supported
by third-party funds, 12.0 would be available only for positions at the state’s higher education
centers located in Woonsocket and Westerly, 10.0 would be available only for positions at the
nursing education center, and 7.0 would be available for the longitudinal data systems program.
University of Rhode Island 2,571.0
Provided that 353.8 of the total authorization would be available only for positions that are
supported by third-party funds.
Rhode Island College 949.2
Provided that 76.0 of the total authorization would be available only for positions that are supported
by third-party funds.
Community College of Rhode Island 849.1
Provided that 89.0 of the total authorization would be available only for positions that are supported
by third-party funds.
Rhode Island State Council on the Arts 10.0
RI Atomic Energy Commission 8.6
Historical Preservation and Heritage Commission 15.6
Office of the Attorney General 264.1
Corrections 1,461.0
Judicial 745.3
Military Staff 93.0
Emergency Management Agency 38.0
Public Safety 633.0
Office of the Public Defender 104.0
Environmental Management 439.0
Coastal Resources Management Council 32.0
Transportation 755.0
Total 15,772.8
No agency or department may employ contracted employee services where contract employees
would work under state employee supervisors without determination of need by the director of
administration acting upon positive recommendations by the budget officer and the personnel
administrator and fifteen (15) days after a public hearing.
Nor may any agency or department contract for services replacing work done by state employees
at that time without determination of need by the director of administration acting upon the positive
recommendations of the state budget officer and the personnel administrator and thirty (30) days
LC000671 - Page 43 of 53

after a public hearing.
SECTION 5. The appropriations from federal funds contained in section 1 shall not be construed
to mean any federal funds or assistance appropriated, authorized, allocated or apportioned to the
State of Rhode Island from the state fiscal recovery fund and capital projects fund enacted pursuant
to the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, P.L. 117-2 for fiscal year 2025 except for those instances
specifically designated.
The State fiscal recovery fund and capital projects Fund fund appropriations herein shall be made
in support of the following projects:
Federal Funds - State Fiscal Recovery Fund
Department of Administration (DOA)
DOA- Pandemic Recovery Office. These funds shall be allocated to finance the pandemic recovery
office established within the department of administration.
DOA - Public Health Response Warehouse Support. These funds shall be allocated to the proper
storage of PPE and other necessary COVID-19 response related supplies.
DOA – Auto-Enrollment Program. These funds shall support a program for automatically enrolling
qualified individuals transitioned off Medicaid coverage at the end of the COVID-19 public health
emergency into qualified health plans to avoid gaps in coverage, administered by HealthSource RI.
DOA - Health Care Facilities. These funds shall address the ongoing staffing needs of nursing
facilities related to the COVID-19 public health emergency. Ten million dollars ($10,00,000) shall
be distributed to nursing facilities based on the number of Medicaid beds days from the 2022 facility
cost reports, provided at least eighty percent (80%) is dedicated to direct care workers.
DOA - Community Learning Center Programming Support Grant. These funds shall be distributed
to municipalities that have approved community learning center projects under the coronavirus
capital projects fund community learning center municipal grant program. An equal amount of
funding will be allocated to each approved community learning center project that reaches
substantial completion as defined by the U.S. Department of Treasury by October 31, 2026.
Municipalities with projects that do not reach substantial completion as defined by the U.S.
Department of Treasury by October 31, 2026, shall return their funding no later than November 15,
2026, for redistribution among other qualified community learning centers. These funds must be
used to support the establishment of U.S. Department of the Treasury compliant health monitoring,
work, and or education programming that will take place in a community learning center.
DOA – Municipal Public Safety Infrastructure. These funds shall be used to provide matching
support to cities and towns to make significant public safety facilities infrastructure improvements
including new construction. Funding priority shall be based on project readiness and limited to
LC000671 - Page 44 of 53

those for which the total costs exceed $1.0 million. Matching funds to any municipality will be
limited to $5.0 million for projects that serve a regional purpose and $1.0 million for others.
Office of Energy Resources (OER)
OER - Electric Heat Pump Grant Program. These funds shall support a grant program within the
office of energy resources to assist homeowners and small-to-mid-size business owners with the
purchase and installation of high-efficiency electric heat pumps, with an emphasis on families in
environmental justice communities, minority-owned businesses, and community organizations
who otherwise cannot afford this technology. The office of energy resources shall report to the
speaker of the house and senate president no later than April 1 of each year the results of this
program, including but not limited to, the number of grants issued; amount of each grant and the
average grant amount; and the expected cumulative carbon emissions reductions associated with
heat pumps that received a grant.
Department of Labor and Training (DLT)
DLT – Enhanced Real Jobs. These funds shall support the real jobs Rhode Island program in the
development of job partnerships, connecting industry employers adversely impacted by the
pandemic to individuals enrolled in workforce training programs.
Executive Office of Commerce (EOC)
EOC – Minority Business Accelerator. These funds shall support a program to invest additional
resources to enhance the growth of minority business enterprises as defined in chapter 14.1 of title
37. The initiative will support a range of assistance and programming, including financial and
technical assistance, entrepreneurship training, space for programming and co-working, and
assistance accessing low-interest loans. Commerce shall work with minority small business
associations, including the Rhode Island Black Business Association (RIBBA), to advance this
program.
EOC – Bioscience Investments. These funds shall support a program to invest in the biosciences
industry in Rhode Island in conjunction with the Rhode Island life science hub as established in
chapter 99 of title 23. This program will include, but is not limited to, the development of one or
more wet lab incubator spaces in collaboration with industry partners; the creation of a fund that
will support wrap-around services to aid in the commercialization of technology and business
development, growth of the biosciences talent pipeline, and support for staff to implement the
bioscience investments initiative.
EOC - Assistance to Impacted Industries. These funds shall be allocated to provide assistance to
the tourism, hospitality, and events industries for outdoor and public space capital improvements
and event programming.
LC000671 - Page 45 of 53

EOC – Small Business Assistance. These funds shall be allocated to a program of financial and
technical assistance to small businesses and COVID-impacted industries as follows: twelve million
five hundred thousand dollars ($12,500,000) shall be provided as direct payments to businesses for
lost revenue; seventeen million three hundred thousand dollars ($17,300,000) shall support
technical assistance for long-term business capacity building, public health upgrades, energy
efficiency improvements, and outdoor programming; and one million five hundred thousand dollars
($1,500,000) shall be allocated to support administration of these programs. To be eligible to
receive funds or support under this program a business must have less than two million dollars
($2,000,000) in annual gross revenues and demonstrate a negative impact from the COVID-19
pandemic as determined by the Rhode Island commerce corporation. Under this program, total
support in the form of direct payments, or technical assistance grants shall not exceed ten thousand
dollars ($10,000) per eligible business through either program. Total support in the form of direct
payments, technical assistance, and grants for public health upgrades, energy efficiency and
outdoor programming shall not exceed thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) in the aggregate. Provided
further that at least twenty percent (20%) of all funds must be reserved for awards to assist minority
business enterprises as defined in chapter 14.1 of title 37. Of the aggregate funding described above,
two million six hundred thousand dollars ($2,600,000) of funds that are unexpended as of July 1,
2024, shall be allocated to a program to assist small businesses impacted by the closure and
reconstruction of the northern span of the Washington Bridge. Of those funds, one million two
hundred thousand dollars ($1,200,000) shall be allocated to the city of East Providence, eight
hundred thousand dollars ($800,000) shall be allocated to the city of Providence, and six hundred
thousand dollars ($600,000) shall be allocated to the executive office of commerce. Funds shall be
used to provide direct grants or any such other forms of assistance as deemed appropriate, and shall
not be subject to the criteria, limitations, and reservation requirements described above.
Department of Housing
Housing – Development of Affordable Housing. These funds shall expand a program at the Rhode
Island housing and mortgage finance corporation to provide additional investments in (1) the
development of affordable housing units in conjunction with general obligation bond funds and
other sources of available financing according to guidelines approved by the coordinating
committee of the housing resources commission or (2) site acquisition and predevelopment
expenses for affordable housing. Of this amount, ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be
available to Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation to establish a pilot program
that shall direct funds to support low income public housing through project-based rental assistance
vouchers and financing for pre-development, improvement, and housing production costs. Within
LC000671 - Page 46 of 53

eighteen (18) months, any money available for the pilot that is not yet allocated to viable projects,
or which has been awarded to public housing authorities which are unable to demonstrate
substantial completion of all work within eighteen (18) months of receipt of any such funds, shall
be returned to this program and no longer be included in the pilot. Determination of viability and
substantial completion under the pilot shall be at the sole discretion of the secretary of housing.
Housing – Targeted Housing Development. These funds shall create a program at the department
of housing to develop housing in targeted areas and/or priority projects. Of this overall program,
twenty-two million dollars ($22,000,000) shall be allocated into a priority project fund that
advances the following categories: permanent supportive housing, housing dedicated to vulnerable
populations, individuals transitioning out of state care, and extremely low-income Rhode Islanders.
Of this overall program, four million dollars ($4,000,000) shall be allocated to support the
development of transit-oriented housing as approved by the secretary of housing.
Housing – Site Acquisition. These funds shall be allocated to the Rhode Island housing and
mortgage finance corporation toward the acquisition of properties for redevelopment as affordable
and supportive housing to finance projects that include requirements for deed restrictions not less
than thirty (30) years, and a non-recourse structure.
Housing – Workforce Housing. These funds shall be allocated to the Rhode Island housing and
mortgage finance corporation to support a program to increase the housing supply for families
earning up to 120 percent of area median income.
Housing – Home Repair and Community Revitalization. These funds shall expand the acquisition
and revitalization program administered by the Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance
corporation to finance the acquisition and redevelopment of blighted properties to increase the
number of commercial and community spaces in disproportionately impacted communities and or
to increase the development of affordable housing. Residential development will serve households
earning no more than 80 percent of area median income. Commercial and community spaces must
serve or meet the needs of residents of a census tract where at least 51 percent of the residents are
low-and moderate-income persons. Of this amount, four million five hundred thousand dollars
($4,500,000) will support critical home repairs within the same communities.
Housing – Preservation of Affordable Housing Units. These funds shall support a program to
preserve affordable housing units at risk of foreclosure or blight.
Housing – Predevelopment and Capacity Building. These funds shall support a program to increase
contract staffing capacity to administer proposed affordable housing projects. These funds will
support research and data analysis, stakeholder engagement, and the expansion of services for
people experiencing homelessness.
LC000671 - Page 47 of 53

Housing – Municipal Planning. Of these funds, one million three hundred thousand dollars
($1,300,000) shall support a housing development-focused municipal fellows program within the
department of housing and one million dollars ($1,000,000) shall support municipalities to study
and implement zoning changes that up-zone or otherwise enable additional housing development
in proximity to transit.
Housing – Homelessness Assistance Program. These funds shall support a program to expand
housing navigation, behavioral health, and stabilization services to address pandemic-related
homelessness. The program will support services for people transitioning from homelessness to
housing, including individuals transitioning out of the adult correctional institutions.
Housing – Homelessness Infrastructure. These funds shall be used to support a program to respond
to and prevent homelessness, including but not limited to, acquisition or construction of temporary
or permanent shelter and other housing solutions and stabilization programs.
Housing – Municipal Homelessness Support Initiative. These funds shall be used to support a
program to award grants to cities and towns for public safety expenses and other municipal services
that support individuals and families experiencing homelessness.
Housing – Proactive Housing Development. These funds shall be used to support the creation,
staffing, and initial activities of a proactive development subsidiary of the Rhode Island housing
and mortgage finance corporation, established pursuant to § 42-55-5.1.
Housing – Housing Related Infrastructure. These funds shall be allocated to the Rhode Island
infrastructure bank as established in chapter 12.2 of title 46 to support physical infrastructure that
is necessary to produce additional housing. All expenditures made with these funds must be for the
pre-development and development of site-related infrastructure for housing that meets affordable
housing pricing and/or income criteria and other criteria established by the department of housing.
Housing – Statewide Housing Plan. These funds shall be allocated to the development of a
statewide comprehensive housing plan to assess current and future housing needs, consider barriers
to home ownership and affordability, and identify services needed for increased investments toward
disproportionately impacted individuals and communities. These funds shall be used to support
municipal planning efforts to identify and cultivate viable sites and housing projects.
Quonset Development Corporation (QDC)
QDC – Port of Davisville. These funds shall be allocated to expand a program developing port
infrastructure and services at the Port of Davisville in Quonset in accordance with the corporation’s
master plan.
Executive Office of Health and Human Services (EOHHS)
EOHHS - Pediatric Recovery. These funds shall support a program to provide relief to pediatric
LC000671 - Page 48 of 53

providers in response to the decline in visitation and enrollment caused by the public health
emergency and incentivize providers to increase developmental and psychosocial behavioral
screenings.
EOHHS - Certified Community Behavioral Clinics. These funds shall be allocated to a program to
support certified community behavioral health clinics to bolster behavioral health supports, medical
screening and monitoring, and social services to particularly vulnerable populations in response to
a rise in mental health needs during the public health emergency.
Department of Children, Youth and Families (DCYF)
DCYF – Provider Workforce Stabilization. These funds shall be allocated to support workforce
stabilization supplemental wage payments and sign-on bonuses to eligible direct care and
supporting care staff of contracted service providers.
DCYF - Psychiatric Treatment Facility. These funds shall be allocated to expand existing
psychiatric residential treatment facility capacity to provide intensive residential treatment options
for adolescent girls and young women who face severe and complex behavioral health challenges.
Department of Health (DOH)
DOH – COVID-19 Operational Support. These funds shall be allocated to continue COVID-19
mitigation activities at the department of health and to address the public health impacts of the
pandemic in Rhode Island.
DOH - Public Health Clinics. Of these funds, $1,720,118 shall be allocated to the RI Free Clinic to
improve statewide access and quality of primary care for uninsured adults; to increase access to
dental care for uninsured adults integrated into medical care at the clinic; and, to build infrastructure
for telehealth and electronic medical records, Additionally, $2.0 million shall be allocated to Rhode
Island Public Health Foundation/DBA Open Door Health to support the purchase of existing land
and facilities in order to expand services for people who are disproportionately impacted by the
COVID-19 pandemic. These funds may be used to support the purchase of land, the costs of
acquiring a building or constructing a facility, as well as related costs. The terms and conditions of
the allocation shall require Rhode Island Public Health Foundation/DBA Open Door Health to
execute a purchase and sale agreement by June 30, 2024, for any part of the allocation that is used
for the purchase of land. For any part of the allocation that is used for the acquisition or construction
of a facility a contract for such purpose must be executed by June 30, 2024. Any part of the
allocation that is not used for the execution of a purchase and sale agreement or under contract for
the acquisition or construction of a facility shall be returned to the state by July 31, 2024. Any part
of the allocation that is unexpended by December 31, 2026, regardless of the purpose for which it
was obligated, shall be returned to the state no later than January 31, 2027.
LC000671 - Page 49 of 53

Department of Human Services (DHS)
DHS – Child Care Support. To address the adverse impact the pandemic has had on the child care
sector, the funds allocated to this program will provide retention bonuses for direct-care staff at
child care centers and licensed family providers in response to pandemic-related staffing shortages
and start up and technical assistance grants for family child care providers. Retention bonuses shall
be paid monthly or as often as administratively feasible, but not less than quarterly. The director of
the department of human services and the director of the department of children, youth and families
may waive any fees otherwise assessed upon child care provider applicants who have been awarded
the family child care provider incentive grant. The allocation to this program will also support
quality improvements, the creation of a workforce registry, and additional funds for educational
opportunities for direct care staff.
DHS – SNAP Retail Incentive Pilot. The funds allocated to the Supplemental Nutritional
Assistance Program (SNAP) Retail Incentive Pilot shall be used to reimburse the expenditures
made from general revenue prior to January 1, 2025, in support of the Rhode Island Eat Well, Be
Well Rewards Program. The Rhode Island Eat Well, Be Well Rewards Program is the first and
only statewide retail SNAP incentive program in the United States and provides SNAP recipients
an additional fifty cents ($0.50) for every one dollar ($1.00) of SNAP benefits spent on eligible
fresh fruit and vegetable purchases, up to twenty-five dollars ($25).
Department of Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals (BHDDH)
BHDDH – Crisis Intervention Trainings. To respond to the increased volume of mental-health
related calls reported by police departments, these funds shall be allocated to the crisis intervention
training program to provide training every three years for law enforcement as well as continuing
education opportunities.
BHDDH - 9-8-8 Hotline. These funds shall be allocated for the creation and operation of a 9-8-8
hotline to maintain compliance with the National Suicide Hotline Designation Act of 2020 and the
Federal Communications Commission-adopted rules to assure that all citizens receive a consistent
level of 9-8-8 and crisis behavioral health services.
Rhode Island Department of Elementary and Secondary Education (ELSEC)
RIDE - Adult Education Providers. These funds shall be directly distributed through the office of
adult education to nonprofit adult education providers to expand access to educational programs
and literary services.
RIDE – Out of School Time Education Providers. These funds shall be directly distributed through
the office of student, community and academic supports to expand access to educational programs.
Office of Postsecondary Commissioner (OPC)
LC000671 - Page 50 of 53

OPC – RI Reconnect. These funds shall support a program to improve postsecondary degree and
credential attainment among working-age Rhode Islanders. The program will assist students in
addressing barriers to education completion, particularly among communities of color and lower
socio-economic strata. A portion of these funds will be used to address barriers to the attainment
of teacher certification as a second language education teacher, grades PK-12, and as an all grades
special education teacher.
OPC – RIC Cybersecurity Center. These funds shall support the establishment of the institute for
cybersecurity and emerging technologies at Rhode Island College, which will provide certificate,
baccalaureate, and master’s level courses with focuses on research and developing highly skilled
cybersecurity professionals. Funding shall be appropriated through the office of postsecondary
commissioner.
OPC – Fresh Start Scholarship. These funds shall support a program to provide scholarships to
adult students with some college credits, but no degree, with a focus on students who dropped-out
of the community college of Rhode Island. This program will target students who are not meeting
satisfactory academic progress requirements, which makes them ineligible for federal financial
assistance.
OPC – Foster Care Youth Scholarship. These funds shall support a last dollar scholarship program
for DCYF foster care youth exiting the system to attend Rhode Island college and would fully fund
tuition, room and board, and/or support services, including during the summer months. Funding
would be distributed through the Rhode Island college foundation.
Department of Public Safety (DPS)
DPS – Support for Survivors of Domestic Violence. These funds shall be allocated to invest in the
nonprofit community to provide additional housing, clinical and mental health services to victims
of domestic violence and sexual assault. This includes increased investments for therapy and
counseling, housing assistance, job training, relocation aid and case management.
Department of Transportation (DOT)
DOT - Municipal Roads Grant Program. These funds shall support a program to distribute grants
with a required local match for the replacement, rehabilitation, preservation, and maintenance of
existing roads, sidewalks, and bridges. These funds shall be distributed equally to each city and
town provided that each municipality is required to provide a sixty-seven percent (67%) match.
DOT – Turnpike and Bridge Authority – Safety Barriers Study. These funds shall be used by the
Turnpike and Bridge Authority to conduct a study to identify and evaluate the options to prevent
and address the risk of suicide on bridges under its purview.
DOT - RIPTA Operating Grant. These funds shall provide operating support to the Rhode Island
LC000671 - Page 51 of 53

public transit authority.
DOT - Washington Bridge Project. These funds shall support the non-federal share or matching
requirement on federal funds for priority transportation projects, including but not limited to the
Washington Bridge project.
Federal Funds - Capital Projects Fund
Department of Administration (DOA)
DOA - CPF Administration. These funds shall be allocated to the department of administration to
oversee the implementation of the capital projects fund award from the American Rescue Plan Act.
DOA – Municipal and Higher Ed Matching Community Learning Center Municipal Grant
Program. These funds shall be allocated to a matching fund program for cities and towns that
renovate or build a community wellness learning center that meets the work, education, and health
monitoring requirements identified by the U.S. Department of the Treasury.
Executive Office of Commerce (EOC)
EOC – Broadband. These funds shall be allocated to the executive office of commerce to invest in
broadband projects to provide high-speed, reliable internet to all Rhode Islanders. The secretary of
commerce, in partnership with the director of business regulation, will run a series of requests for
proposals for broadband infrastructure projects, providing funds to municipalities, public housing
authorities, business cooperatives and local internet service providers for projects targeted at those
unserved and underserved by the current infrastructure as defined by national telecommunications
and information administration standards using the evidentiary bases authorized by the United
States department of the treasury for the capital projects fund. This investment shall be used to
augment or provide a match for federal funds for broadband investment made available through the
Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act. These funds shall be used in accordance with the statewide
broadband strategic plan and may not be obligated nor expended prior to its submission in
accordance with the requirements of the Rhode Island broadband development program set forth
in chapter 162 of title 42.
SECTION 6. The pandemic recovery office shall monitor the progress and performance of all
programs financed by the state fiscal recovery fund and the capital projects fund. On or before
October 31, 2023 through January 31, 2025, and quarterly thereafter until and including October
31, 2026, the office shall provide a report to the speaker of the house and senate president, with
copies to the chairpersons of the house and senate finance committees, on a quarterly basis,
identifying programs that are at risk of significant underspending or noncompliance with federal or
state requirements. Commencing with the report due on April 30, 2025, the report will be provided
to the speaker of the house and senate president, with copies to the chairpersons of the house and
LC000671 - Page 52 of 53

senate finance committees, biannually thereafter until and including October 31, 2026. The report,
at a minimum must include an assessment of how programs that are at risk can be remedied. In the
event that any state fiscal recovery fund program would put the state at risk of forfeiture of federal
funds, the governor may propose to reallocate reclassify funding from the at-risk program to the
unemployment insurance trust fund other eligible uses as determined by U.S. Treasury. This
proposal will be referred to the General Assembly within the first ten (10) days of November to go
into effect thirty (30) days hence, unless rejected by formal action of the house and senate acting
concurrently within that time. The governor will notify the General Assembly within thirty (30)
days of such reclassification.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any general laws to the contrary, the department of environmental
management shall transfer to the state controller the sum of three million dollars ($3,000,000) from
the underground storage tank trust fund restricted receipt account by June 30, 2025.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any general laws to the contrary, the Rhode Island student loan
authority shall transfer to the state controller by June 30, 2025, the sum of two million seven
hundred thousand dollars ($2,700,000).
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any general laws to the contrary, the Rhode Island infrastructure
bank shall transfer to the state controller by June 30, 2025, the sum of two million dollars
($2,000,000).
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any general laws to the contrary, the department of revenue shall
transfer to the state controller by June 30, 2025, the sum of five hundred seventy nine thousand
seven hundred eighty eight dollars ($579,788) from the Marijuana Trust Fund restricted receipt
account.
SECTION 11. This article shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000671
========
LC000671 - Page 53 of 53